Hawaii statutes.
§6E-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Aviation artifact" means airplanes,
fallen aircraft, crash sites, or any objects or materials associated with the
history of aerospace in Hawaii which are over fifty years old, or determined to
be of exceptional historic significance by the department. This term includes
but is not limited to actual aircraft, aircraft parts, military equipment,
books, documents, and other related items.

"Burial good" means any item
reasonably believed to have been intentionally placed with the human skeletal
remains of an individual or individuals at the time of burial.

"Burial site" means any specific
unmarked location where prehistoric or historic human skeletal remains and
their associated burial goods are interred, and its immediate surrounding
archaeological context, deemed a unique class of historic property and not
otherwise included in section 6E-41.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Historic preservation" means the
research, protection, restoration, rehabilitation, and interpretation of
buildings, structures, objects, districts, areas, and sites, including
underwater sites and burial sites, significant to the history, architecture,
archaeology, or culture of this State, its communities, or the nation.

"Historic property" means any
building, structure, object, district, area, or site, including heiau and
underwater site, which is over fifty years old.

"Human skeletal remains" means the
body or any part of the body of a deceased human being.

"Mitigation plan" means a plan,
approved by the department, for the care and disposition of historic
properties, aviation artifacts, and burial sites or the contents thereof, that
includes monitoring, protection, restoration, and interpretation plans.

"Person" means any individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, or association.

"Programmatic agreement" means a
document that sets forth the terms of a formal, legally binding agreement and
establishes a process for consultation, review, and compliance with federal
laws.

"Project" means any activity directly
undertaken by the State or its political subdivisions or supported in whole or
in part through appropriations, contracts, grants, loans, or other forms of
funding assistance from the State or its political subdivisions or involving
any lease, permit, license, certificate, land use change, or other entitlement
for use issued by the State or its political subdivisions.

"State historic preservation officer"
means that officer appointed by the governor as provided in section 6E-5. [L
1976, c 104, pt of §2; am L 1985, c 108, §1; am L 1990, c 306, §4; am L 1992, c
113, §1; am L 1996, c 97, §3; am L 2005, c 128, §2; am L 2006, c 45, §1; am L
2013, c 85, §1; am L 2014, c 96, §2]

Case Notes

As: (1) §6E-42 applies to any project "which may affect
historic property ... or a burial site", as defined by this section; (2) a
burial site can be found in a cemetery; and (3) a cemetery can also be a
historic property, as also defined by this section, church building project was
not exempt from the historic preservation review process required by §6E-42 and
its implementing rules because the project involved a cemetery. 128 H. 455
(App.), 290 P.3d 525 (2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next